North Carolina, session 2025, SB691.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 116-143.1 is amended by adding the following new subsections
to read:
"(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a person who meets all of the
following qualifications shall be eligible to be charged the in-State tuition rate:
(1) The person graduated and received a high school diploma from a school
within North Carolina or received a high school equivalency diploma within
North Carolina.
(2) The person attended North Carolina schools for a minimum of two
consecutive years immediately prior to completing high school.
(3) If the person does not have lawful immigration status, the person submits an
affidavit to the State Education Assistance Authority through the coordinated
and centralized residency determination process within 60 days of enrollment
asserting that, to the extent permitted under federal law, he or she has filed an
application to legalize his or her status or he or she intends to file an
application to legalize his or her status upon becoming eligible to do so.
(4) The person enrolled in a constituent institution or community college.
(o) Any information obtained as part of the process of applying for in-State tuition
pursuant to subsection (n) of this section shall be confidential and is not a public record."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 academic year.
*S691-v-1*